Utah statutes.
9-4-1107.   Enterprise Fund -- Creation -- Revenue -- Uses.
(1) (a)  There is created an enterprise fund entitled the Utah State Fair
Fund.
(b)  The executive director shall administer the fund under the direction of
the board.
(2)  The fund consists of money generated from the following revenue sources:
(a)  lease payments from person or entities leasing the state fair park or any
other facilities owned by the corporation;
(b)  revenues received from any expositions or other events wholly or
partially sponsored by the corporation;
(c)  aid or contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value
from any source, including any grants or appropriations from any department,
agency, or instrumentality of the United States or Utah;
(d)  appropriations made to the fund by the Legislature; and
(e)  any other income obtained by the corporation.
(3)  (a)  The fund shall earn interest.
(b)  All interest earned on fund money shall be deposited into the fund.
(4)  The executive director may use fund money to operate, maintain, and
support the Utah state fair, the state fair park, and other expositions
sponsored by the corporation.
